Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.265

Law enforcement memorial license plates.

"Law enforcement memorial license plates" means license plates issued under RCW 46.18.200 that display a symbol honoring law enforcement officers in Washington killed in the line of duty.

[ 2011 c 171 s 15; 2004 c 221 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2011 c 171: See notes following RCW 4.24.210.